Massachusetts, session 194th, H5455.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. As used in this section, the following word shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meaning:-
“Department”, the department of public health
SECTION 2. Not later than December 31, 2027, the department shall prepare a report
summarizing an update on the progress of the implementation of recommendations issued by the
medical spa task force report as established in chapter 81 of acts 2006. This report shall include,
but not be limited to, (i) an analysis of the report’s recommendations, (ii) whether the department
took any action on the recommendations, and; (iii) determine if an updated report is necessary.
Said report shall be submitted to the joint committee on public health and the joint committee on
consumer protection and professional licensure.
of 1